Missouri, session 2026, HB3061.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 536.031, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 536.031, to read as follows:
536.031. 1. There is established a publication to be known as the "Code of State
Regulations", which shall be published in a format and medium as prescribed by the secretary
of state from time to time as determined by the secretary of state.
2. The code of state regulations shall contain the full text of all rules of state agencies
in force and effect upon the effective date of the first publication thereof, and effective
September 1, 1990, it shall be revised no less frequently than monthly thereafter so as to
include all rules of state agencies subsequently made, amended or rescinded. The code may
also include citations, references, or annotations, prepared by the state agency adopting the
rule or by the secretary of state, to any intraagency ruling, attorney general's opinion,
determination, decisions, order, or other action of the administrative hearing commission, or
any determination, decision, order, or other action of a court interpreting, applying,
discussing, distinguishing, or otherwise affecting any rule published in the code.
3. The code of state regulations shall be published in a format and medium as
prescribed by the secretary of state.
4. An agency may incorporate by reference rules, regulations, standards, and
guidelines of an agency of the United States or a nationally or state-recognized organization
or association without publishing the material in full. The reference in the agency rules shall
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3061 2
fully identify the incorporated material by publisher, address, and date in order to specify how
a copy of the material may be obtained, and shall state that the referenced rule, regulation,
standard, or guideline does not include any later amendments or additions, except that:
(1) Hospital licensure regulations promulgated under this chapter and chapter 197
may incorporate by reference Medicare conditions of participation, as defined in section
197.005, and later additions or amendments to such conditions of participation; [and]
(2) Hospital licensure regulations governing life safety code standards promulgated
under this chapter and chapter 197 to implement section 197.065 may incorporate, by
reference, later additions or amendments to such rules, regulations, standards, or guidelines as
needed to consistently apply current standards of safety and practice;
(3) Medicaid regulations promulgated under this chapter and chapter 208 may
incorporate by reference Medicare fee schedules, as defined in state regulation, and
later additions or amendments to Medicaid reimbursement methodologies promulgated
in title 13 of the code of state regulations; and
(4) Medicaid regulations promulgated under this chapter and chapter 208 may
incorporate by reference later additions or amendments to federal rules and regulations
as needed to administer the Missouri Medicaid program.
5. The agency adopting a rule, regulation, standard, or guideline under this section
shall maintain a copy of the referenced rule, regulation, standard, or guideline at the
headquarters of the agency and shall make it available to the public for inspection and
copying at no more than the actual cost of reproduction. The secretary of state may omit from
the code of state regulations such material incorporated by reference in any rule the
publication of which would be unduly cumbersome or expensive.
6. The courts of this state shall take judicial notice, without proof, of the contents of
the code of state regulations.
✔